es: Tipo de construcción de cinta tejida: Trenzado doble; Plano; Trenzado hueco; Cinturón de seguridad; Trenzado simple; Tubular; Otro
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie siete: Dvojitý oplet; Ploché; Dutý oplet; Bezpečnostný pás; Jednoduchý oplet; Rúrkové; Iné
it: Tipo di costruzione delle cinghie: Doppia treccia; Piatta; Treccia cava; Cintura di sicurezza; Singola treccia; Tubolare; Altro
fr: Type de construction en sangle: Tresse double; Plate; Tresse creuse; Ceinture de sécurité; Tresse simple; Tubulaire; Autre
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на ремъчната лента: Двойна оплетка; Плоска; Куха оплетка; Предпазен колан; Единична оплетка; Тръбна; Друго
nb: Konstruksjonstype for webbing: Dobbelflettet; Flat; Hulflettet; Setebelte; Enkeltflettet; Rørformet; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de estrutura em tela: Trança dupla; Chata; Trança oca; Cinto de segurança; Trança simples; Tubular; Outro
pl: Typ konstrukcji taśmy: Oplot podwójny; Płaski; Oplot pusty; Pas bezpieczeństwa; Oplot pojedynczy; Rurkowy; Inne
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างสายรัด: ถักคู่; แบน; ถักกลวง; เข็มขัดนิรภัย; ถักเดี่ยว; ทรงหลอด; อื่นๆ
da: Konstruktionstype for webbing: Dobbeltflettet; Flad; Hulflettet; Sikkerhedssele; Enkeltflettet; Rørformet; Andet
de: Gurtbandart: Doppelgeflecht; Flach; Hohlgeflecht; Sicherheitsgurt; Einzelgeflecht; Schlauchförmig; Andere
zh-CN: 扁带结构类型: 双编织; 扁平; 空心编织; 安全带; 单编织; 管状; 其他
ja: ウェビング構造タイプ: ダブルブレード; フラット; ホローブレード; シートベルト; シングルブレード; チューブラー; その他
zh-TW: 織帶結構類型: 雙股編織; 扁平; 中空編織; 安全帶式; 單股編織; 管狀; 其他
ko: 웨빙 구조 유형: 이중 브레이드; 플랫; 중공 브레이드; 시트벨트; 단일 브레이드; 튜브형; 기타
tr: Kolon dokuma yapım tipi: Çift örgü; Düz; İçi boş örgü; Emniyet kemeri; Tek örgü; Boru tipi; Diğer
vi: Kiểu kết cấu của dây đai dệt: Bện đôi; Dẹt; Bện rỗng; Dây đai an toàn; Bện đơn; Dạng ống; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de construção da cinta: Trança dupla; Plano; Trança oca; Cinto de segurança; Trança simples; Tubular; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave gurtne: Dvojno pletenje; Ravno; Votlo pletenje; Varnostni pas; Enojno pletenje; Cevasto; Drugo
ru: Тип конструкции стропы: Двойное плетение; Плоская; Полое плетение; Ременная лента; Одинарное плетение; Трубчатая; Другое
nl: Type bandweefselconstructie: Dubbel gevlochten; Plat; Hol gevlochten; Autogordel; Enkel gevlochten; Buisvormig; Overig
el: Τύπος κατασκευής ιμάντα: Διπλή πλέξη; Επίπεδη; Κοίλη πλέξη; Ζώνης ασφαλείας; Μονή πλέξη; Σωληνοειδής; Άλλο
fi: Verkon rakennetyyppi: Kaksoispunos; Litteä; Ontelopunos; Turvavyö; Yksinkertainen punos; Putkimainen; Muu
hu: Heveder kialakítás típusa: Dupla fonatú; Lapos; Üreges fonatú; Biztonsági öv típusú; Szimpla fonatú; Csőheveder; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije trake: Dvostruka pletenica; Ravno; Šuplja pletenica; Pojasna traka; Jednostruka pletenica; Cjevasto; Ostalo
lt-LT: Diržų konstrukcijos tipas: Dvigubo pynimo; Plokščia; Tuščiavidurio pynimo; Saugos diržo tipo; Viengubo pynimo; Vamzdelinė; Kita
en: Webbing construction type: Double braid; Flat; Hollow braid; Seatbelt; Single braid; Tubular; Other
cs: Typ konstrukce popruhu: Dvojitý oplet; Plochý; Dutý oplet; Bezpečnostní pás; Jednoduchý oplet; Hadicový; Jiný
ro-RO: Tip de construcție a chingii: Împletitură dublă; Plat; Împletitură tubulară goală; Tip centură de siguranță; Împletitură simplă; Tubular; Altele
sv: Konstruktionstyp för bandväv: Dubbelflätad; Platt; Ihåligt flätad; Bilbälte; Enkelflätad; Tubulär; Övrigt